Washington statutes.
RCW 4.24.180

Disposition of fines, fees, penalties and forfeitures—Venue.

Fines and forfeitures not specially granted or otherwise appropriated by law, when recovered, shall be paid into the school fund of the proper county: PROVIDED, That all fees, fines, forfeitures and penalties collected or assessed by a district court because of the violation of a state law shall be remitted as provided in chapter 3.62 RCW as now exists or is later amended. Whenever, by the provisions of law, any property real or personal shall be forfeited to the state, or to any officer for its use, the action for the recovery of such property may be commenced in any county where the defendant may be found or where such property may be.

[ 1987 c 202 s 115; 1969 ex.s. c 199 s 9; Code 1881 s 660; 1869 p 153 s 600; RRS s 966.]

NOTES:

Intent—1987 c 202: See note following RCW 2.04.190.

Disposition of fines, fees, costs, penalties and forfeitures: RCW 10.82.070.